Louisiana, session 2026, HB738.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3394(B), (D), (E)(1), and (F)(1) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 17:3394(F)(4) and (5) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§3394. Disciplinary proceedings
* * *
B. Any student enrolled at an institution under the jurisdiction of the
management board and accused of a violation of the disciplinary or conduct rules
that carries a potential penalty of suspension of ten or more days, deferred
suspension, or expulsion has the right to be represented, at the student's expense, by
an attorney or a non-attorney advocate who may fully participate during any
disciplinary proceeding or during any other procedure adopted and used by that
institution to address an alleged violation of the institution's nonacademic rules or
policies. This right applies to both the student who has been accused of the violation
and the student who is the alleged victim, if applicable. Prior to scheduling a
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 738 ENROLLED
disciplinary proceeding, the institution shall inform the students in writing of their
rights as provided by this Section.
* * *
D.(1) An institution shall provide a student or student organization subject
to a charge or disciplinary proceeding with a written notice of the charge not later
than fourteen business days after receiving credible information, including but not
limited to a police report or other documentation, sufficient to initiate formal
disciplinary proceedings.
(2) A student or student organization subject to a charge or disciplinary
proceeding by the institution is entitled, upon receiving notice of the charge, to The
written notice shall include information of on any and all violations of the
institution's nonacademic rules or policies and the disciplinary proceedings or
charges that will occur as a result.
(3) This notice shall include but need not be limited to each and every
section of the institution's rules or policies that the student or student organization
is alleged to have violated and any evidence the institution used and collected in
making the charge.
E. When a violation is punishable by suspension of ten or more days or
expulsion, or when a violation by a student organization is punishable by suspension
or removal of the organization from the institution, the disciplinary procedures
contained in the code of student conduct shall include but need not be limited to the
following:
(1)(a) Afford the accused student or organization the express presumption
of innocence and set forth that the student or the organization may not be deemed
guilty of the violation until the student or the organization formally acknowledges
responsibility or the conclusion of a hearing where the institution has proven every
element of the violation necessary to constitute guilt responsibility by clear and
convincing evidence. The standard of establishing guilt responsibility through clear
and convincing evidence shall not alter the burden of proof in hearings held pursuant
to Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 or R.S. 17:3399.11 et seq.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 738 ENROLLED
(b)(i) Notwithstanding Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph, in any disciplinary
proceeding arising from physical conduct that resulted in serious bodily injury as
defined in R.S. 14:2(C) or death, the institution shall establish responsibility by a
preponderance of the evidence.
(ii) The preponderance standard shall apply only when the institution
possesses objective and verifiable evidence that serious bodily injury or death
occurred and that the alleged conduct is directly connected thereto.
(iii) Such evidence may include but is not limited to law enforcement
reports, medical records, coroner reports, or other comparable documentation. The
institution shall issue written findings identifying the objective evidence relied upon.
* * *
F.(1) Any student or student organization that is found to be in violation of
the institution's nonacademic rules or policies shall be afforded an opportunity to
appeal the institution's initial decision to an appellate entity that is an institutional
administrator or body that did not make the initial decision. Such an appeal shall be
filed within ten fourteen business days after receiving final notice of the institution's
decision. The right to appeal the result of the institution's disciplinary proceeding
also applies to the student who is the alleged victim, if applicable. The institution
may designate the appellate entity as the final institutional authority on the matter;
however, nothing in this Section shall preclude a court from granting a prevailing
plaintiff equitable relief.
* * *
(4)(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, sanctions imposed under
this Section shall not take effect, be enforced, or be considered final until the later
of:
(i) The deadline for filing an appeal has expired without an appeal being
filed.
(ii) All institutional appeals have been completed, and any appellate
decisions have been issued.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 738 ENROLLED
(b) Nothing in this Paragraph shall prohibit an institution from taking
reasonable interim safety measures, including but not limited to housing adjustments,
academic changes, or mutual no-contact directives, as long as such measures are not
punitive sanctions within the meaning of this Section.
(5) The decisionmaker shall issue a written determination that includes:
(a) A statement of the factual basis for the violations.
(b) A summary of the evidence considered in making the determination.
(c) A description of any sanctions imposed.
(d) A statement of the procedures and timelines for appeal.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.